Massachusetts, session 194th, H2312.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 3 of Chapter 40A of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking the 
following language: 
"No zoning ordinance or by-law shall prohibit or unreasonably regulate the installation of 
solar energy systems or the building of structures that facilitate the collection of solar energy, 
except where necessary to protect the public health, safety or welfare."